nl: Materiaal tandwiel: Acryl; Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Aluminium; Canvas; Koolstofvezel; Keramiek; Katoen; Denim; Elastaan; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Glasvezel; Schuim; Bont; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Leer; Linnen; Lyocell; Metaal; Microvezel; Nylon; Papier; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyethyleen (PE); Polypropyleen (PP); Polyurethaan (PU); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Touw; Rubber; Zijde; Spandex; Staal; Synthetisch; Dekzeil; Titanium; Vinyl; Wol; Andere
bg-BG: Материал на зъбно колело: Акрил; Акрилонитрил-бутадиен-стирол (ABS); Алуминий; Брезент; Въглеродни влакна; Керамика; Памук; Деним; Еластан; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Fiberglass; Пяна; Козина; Юта; Кевлар; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Лиоцел; Метал; Микрофибър; Найлон; Хартия; Пластмаса; Полиамид (PA); Полиетилен (PE); Полипропилен (PP); Полиуретан (PU); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Въже; Каучук; Коприна; Спандекс; Стомана; Синтетичен; Брезент; Титан; Винил; Вълна; Други
en: Gear material: Acrylic; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Aluminum; Canvas; Carbon fiber; Ceramic; Cotton; Denim; Elastane; Faux fur; Faux leather; Fiberglass; Foam; Fur; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Leather; Linen; Lyocell; Metal; Microfiber; Nylon; Paper; Plastic; Polyamide (PA); Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rope; Rubber; Silk; Spandex; Steel; Synthetic; Tarpaulin; Titanium; Vinyl; Wool; Other
sv: Utrustning - material: Akryl; Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Aluminium; Kanvas; Kolfiber; Keramisk; Bomull; Denim; Elastan; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Glasfiber; Skum; Päls; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Läder; Linne; Lyocell; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Papper; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyeten (PE); Polypropen (PP); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Rep; Gummi; Silke; Spandex; Stål; Syntetisk; Presenning; Titan; Vinyl; Ylle; Annat
ru: Материал зубчатого механизма: Акрил; Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС); Алюминий; Холщовая ткань; Углеродное волокно; Керамика; Хлопок; Деним; Эластан; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Стекловолокно; Поролон; Мех; Джут; Кевлар; Латекс; Кожа; Лен; Лиоцелл; Металл; Микрофибра; Нейлон; Бумага; Пластик; Полиамид (ПА); Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Полипропилен (ПП); Полиуретан (ПУ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Трос; Резина; Шелк; Спандекс; Сталь; Синтетика; Брезент; Титан; Винил; Шерсть; Другой
pl: Materiał sprzętu: Akryl; Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Aluminium; Płótno; Włókno węglowe; Ceramika; Bawełna; Drelich; Elastan; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Włókno szklane; Piana; Futrzany; Juta; Kevlar; Lateks; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Liocel; Metal; Mikrofibra; Nylon; Papier; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliamid (PA); Polietylen (PE); Polipropylen (PP); Poliuretan (PU); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Lina; Guma; Jedwab; Spandex; Stal; Syntetyczne; Plandeka; Titanium; Winyl; Wełna; Pozostałe
it: Materiale degli ingranaggi: Acrilico; Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Alluminio; Tela; Fibra di carbonio; Ceramica; Cotone; Denim; Elastan; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Vetroresina; Schiuma; Pelliccia; Iuta; Kevlar; Lattice; Pelle; Lino; Lyocell; Metallo; Microfibra; Nylon; Carta; Plastica; Poliammide (PA); Polietilene (PE); Polipropilene (PP); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Corda; Gomma; Seta; Spandex; Acciaio; Sintetico; Tela cerata; Titanio; Vinile; Lana; Altro
pt-BR: Material da engrenagem: Acrílico; Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Alumínio; Tela; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Algodão; Jeans; Elastane; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Fibra de vidro; Espuma; Pele; Juta; Kevlar; Látex; Couro; Linho; Lyocell; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Papel; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Poliuretano (PU); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Corda; Borracha; Seda; Spandex; Aço; Sintético; Encerado; Titânio; Vinil; Lã; Outro
fr: Matériau des engrenages: Acrylique; Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Aluminum; Toiles; Fibre de carbone; Céramique; Coton; Jean; Elastane; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Fibre de verre; Mousse; Fourrure; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Cuir; Lin; Lyocell; Métal; Microfibre; Nylon; Papier; Plastique; Polyamide (PA); Polyéthylène (PE); Polypropylène (PP); Polyuréthane (PU); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Corde; Caoutchouc; Soie; Spandex; Acier; Synthétique; Tarpaulin; Titane; Vinyl; Laine; Autre
vi: Vật liệu bánh răng: Acrylic; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Nhôm; Toan; Sợi carbon; Gốm; Vải bông; Bò; Elastane; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Sợi thủy tinh; Bọt xốp; Lông thú; Sợi đay; Kevlar; Mủ cao su; Da; Lanh; Lyocell; Kim loại; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Nylon; Giấy; Nhựa; Polyamide (PA); Polyethylene (PE); Polypropylene (PP); Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Dây thừng; Cao su; Lụa; Vải Spandex; Thép; Tổng hợp; Tarpaulin; Titanium; Nhựa vinyl; Len; Khác
hu: Fogaskerék anyaga: Akril; Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol (ABS); Alumínium; Vászon; Szénszál; Kerámia; Pamut; Farmer; Elasztán; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Üveggyapot; Hab; Szőrme; Juta; Kevlár; Latex; Bőr; Lenvászon; Lyocell; Fém; Mikroszálas; Nejlon; Papír; Műanyag; Poliamid (PA); Polietilén (PE); Polipropilén (PP); Poliuretán (PU); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Kötél; Gumi; Selyem; Spandex; Acél; Szintetikus; Vitorlavászon; Titán; Vinil; Gyapjú; Egyéb
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเฟือง: อะคริลิก; อะคริโลไนไตรลบิวตาไดอีนสไตรีน (ABS); อะลูมิเนียม; ผ้าใบ; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; เซรามิก; สำลี; ผ้าเดนิม; อีลาสเทน; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; โฟม; Fur; ใยปอ; Kevlar; ยางพารา; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ผ้าไลโอเซลล์; โลหะ; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; ไนลอน; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); เชือก; ยาง; ผ้าไหม; สแปนเด็กซ์; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; ผ้าใบกันน้ำ; ไทเทเนียม; ไวนิล; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
es: Material del equipo: Acrílico; Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Aluminio; Lienzo; Fibra de carbono; Cerámica; Algodón; Vaquera; Elastano; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Fibra de vidrio; Espuma; Piel; Yute; Kevlar; Látex; Cuero; Lino; Lyocell; Metal; Microfibra; Nylon; Papel; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Soga; Goma; Seda; Spandex; Acero; Sintético; Lona; Titanio; Vinilo; Lana; Otros
zh-CN: 装备材质: 丙烯酸; 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 铝; 画布; 碳纤维; 陶瓷制品; 棉布; 牛仔布; 弹性纤维; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 玻璃纤维; 泡沫; 毛皮围巾; 黄麻; Kevlar; 乳胶; 皮革; 亚麻; 莱赛尔纤维; 金属; 超细纤维; 尼龙; 纸张; 塑料; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 绳索; 橡胶; 丝绸; 氨纶; 钢; 合成; 防水油布; 钛; 乙烯基贴纸; 羊毛; 其他
zh-TW: 齒輪材質: 壓克力; 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 鋁; 帆布; 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 棉布; 牛仔布; 彈性纖維; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 玻璃纖維; 泡棉; 皮草; 黃麻; Kevlar; 乳膠; 皮製; 亞麻; 萊賽爾纖維; 金屬; 超細纖維; 尼龍; 紙; 塑膠; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 繩索; 橡膠; 絲綢; 氨綸; 鋼; 合成; 篷布; 鈦; 乙烯基; 羊毛; 其他
ja: ギア材質: アクリル; アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); アルミニウム; キャンバス; カーボンファイバー; セラミック; コットン; デニム; エラスタン; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; ガラス繊維; フォーム; 毛皮; ジュート; Kevlar; ラテックス; レザー; リネン; リヨセル; 金属; マイクロファイバー; ナイロン; 紙; プラスチック; ポリアミド (PA); ポリエチレン (PE); ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリウレタン (PU); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ロープ; ゴム; シルク; スパンデックス; スチール; 合成品; 防水シート; チタン; ビニール; ウール; その他
fi: Vaihteen materiaali: Akryyli; Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Alumiini; Kanvaasi; Hiilikuitu; Keraaminen; Puuvilla; Denim; Elastaani; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Lasikuitu; Vaahto; Turkis; Juutti; Kevlar; Lateksi; Nahka; Pellava; Lyocell; Metalli; Mikrokuitu; Nailon; Paperi; Muovi; Polyamidi (PA); Polyeteeni (PE); Polypropeeni (PP); Polyuretaani (PU); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Köysi; Kumi; Silkki; Spandex; Teräs; Synteettinen; Pressu; Titaani; Vinyyli; Villa; Muu
nb: Girmateriale: Akryl; Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Aluminium; Lerret; Karbonfiber; Keramikk; Bomull; Denim; Elastan; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Glassfiber; Skum; Pels; Jute; Kevlar; Lateks; Skinn; Lin; Lyocell; Metall; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Papir; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyetylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Tau; Gummi; Silke; Spandex; Stål; Syntetisk; Tarpaulin; Titan; Vinyl; Ull; Annen
da: Gearmateriale: Akryl; Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Aluminum; Lærred; Kulfiber; Keramik; Bomuld; Denim; Elastan; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Glasfiber; Skum; Pels; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Læder; Linned; Lyocell; Metal; Mikrofiber; Nylon; Papir; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Reb; Gummi; Silke; Spandex; Stål; Syntetisk; Presenning; Titanium; Vinyl; Uld; Andet
pt-PT: Material da engrenagem: Acrílico; Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Alumínio; Tela; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Algodão; Ganga; Elastano; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Fibra de vidro; Espuma; Pele; Juta; Kevlar; Látex; Pele; Linho; Liocel; Metal; Microfibra; Náilon; Papel; Plástico; Poliamida (PA); Polietileno (PE); Polipropileno (PP); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Corda; Borracha; Seda; Elastano; Aço; Sintético; Lona; Titânio; Vinil; Lã; Outro
cs: Materiál převodů: Akrylové; Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Hliník; Plátno; Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Bavlna; Džínovina; Elastan; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Skelná vata; Pěna; Srst; Juta; Kevlar; Latex; Kůže; Len; Lyocell; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Papír; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Lano; Guma; Hedvábí; Spandex; Ocel; Syntetické; Celtovina; Titanové; Vinylové; Vlna; Jiné
ro-RO: Material roată dințată: Acrilic; Acrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Aluminiu; Pânză; Fibră de carbon; Ceramică; Bumbac; Denim; Elastan; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Fibră de sticlă; Spumă; Blană; Iută; Kevlar; Latex; Piele; In; Lyocell; Metal; Microfibră; Nailon; Hârtie; Plastic; Poliamidă (PA); Polietilenă (PE); Polipropilenă (PP); Poliuretan (PU); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Frânghie; Cauciuc; Mătase; Spandex; Oțel; Sintetic; Prelată; Titan; Vinil; Lână; Altele
el: Υλικό γραναζιών: Ακρυλικό; Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρόλιο (ABS); Αλουμίνιο; Καμβάς; Ανθρακόνημα; Κεραμικό; Βαμβάκι; Ντένιμ; Ελαστάνη; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Υαλοβάμβακας; Αφρός; Γούνα; Γιούτα; Kevlar; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Λινό; Lyocell; Μέταλλο; Μικροΐνες; Νάιλον; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Σχοινί; Καουτσούκ; Μετάξι; Σπαντέξ; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Μουσαμάς; Τιτάνιο; Βινύλιο; Μαλλί; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal opreme: Akril; Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Aluminij; Platno; Karbonska vlakna; Keramika; Pamuk; Traper; Elastan; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Stakloplastika; Pjena; Krzno; Juta; Kevlar; Lateks; Koža; Lan; Liocel; Metal; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Papir; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Poliuretan (PU); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Uže; Guma; Svila; Elastan; Čelik; Sintetika; Cerada; Titanij; Vinil; Vuna; Ostalo
sl-SI: Material zobnika: Akril; Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Aluminij; Platno; Ogljikova vlakna; Keramika; Bombaž; Džins; Elastan; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Steklena vlakna; Pena; Krzno; Juta; Kevlar; Latex; Usnje; Lan; Liocel; Kovina; Mikrovlakna; Najlon; Papir; Plastika; Poliamid (PA); Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Poliuretan (PU); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Vrv; Guma; Svila; Spandex; Jeklo; Sintetika; Ponjava; Titan; Vinil; Volna; Drugo
lt-LT: Įrangos medžiaga: Akrilas; Akrilnitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Aliuminis; Drobė; Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Medvilnė; Džinsinis audinys; Elastanas; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Stiklo pluoštas; Porolonas; Kailis; Džiutas; Kevlaras; Lateksas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Liocelis; Metalas; Mikropluoštas; Nailonas; Popierius; Plastikas; Poliamidas (PA); Polietilenas (PE); Polipropilenas (PP); Poliuretanas (PU); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Virvė; Kaučiukas; Šilkas; Elastanas; Plienas; Sintetika; Brezentas; Titanas; Vinilas; Vilna; Kita
de: Ausrüstungsmaterial: Acryl; Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Aluminium; Leinwand; Kohlenstofffaser; Keramik; Baumwolle; Denim; Elasthan; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Fiberglas; Schaumstoff; Fell; Jute; Kevlar; Latex; Leder; Leinen; Lyocell; Metall; Mikrofaser; Nylon; Papier; Kunststoff; Polyamid (PA); Polyethylen (PE); Polypropylen (PP); Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Seil; Gummi; Seide; Elasthan; Stahl; Synthetisch; Plane; Titan; Vinyl; Wolle; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Materiál prevodovky: Akryl; Akrylonitrilbutadiénstyrén (ABS); Hliník; Plátno; Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Bavlna; Denim; Elastan; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Sklolaminát; Pena; Kožušina; Juta; Kevlar; Latex; Koža; Ľan; Lyocell; Kov; Mikrovlákno; Nylon; Papier; Plast; Polyamid (PA); Polyetylén (PE); Polypropylén (PP); Polyuretán (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Lano; Guma; Hodváb; Elastan; Oceľ; Syntetický; Plachta; Titán; Vinyl; Vlna; Iné
ko: 기어 소재: 아크릴; 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 알루미늄; 캔버스; 탄소 섬유; 세라믹; 면; 데님; 엘라스테인; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 유리 섬유; 거품; 모피; 주트; Kevlar; 라텍스; 가죽; 린넨; 리오셀; 금속; 극세사; 나일론; 종이; 플라스틱; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리우레탄(PU); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 로프; 고무; 실크; 스판덱스; 강철; 인조; 타포린; 티타늄; 비닐; 울; 기타
tr: Dişli malzemesi: Akrilik; Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Alüminyum; Tuval; Karbon fiber; Seramik; Pamuk; Kot; Elastan; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Fiberglas; Köpük; Kürk; Jüt; Kevlar; Lateks; Deri; Keten; Liyosel; Metal; Mikrofiber; Plastik; Kağıt; Plastik; Poliamid (PA); Polietilen (PE); Polipropilen (PP); Poliüretan (PU); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Halat; Kauçuk; İpek; Spandeks; Çelik; Sentetik; Muşamba; Titanyum; Vinil; Yünlüler; Diğer